Maryland, session 2026, HB0348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That, notwithstanding § 12–2202 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis Article, a
racetrack license issued for a premises in the 5200 block of Park Heights Avenue shall be
considered unexpired until the end of July 1, 2029, 2029:
(1) notwithstanding § 12–1705 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
Article, for the purposes of completing a transfer of ownership and renewal at the same
location; and
(2) notwithstanding § 12–2202 of the Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
Article, for the purpose of completing renovations at the same location.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 3 years and 1 month and, at the end of July
31, 2029, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 1 –